Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2402
Kinds of insurance covered.

The Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act shall apply to all kinds of direct insurance except ocean marine, motor vehicle service contract reimbursement, and those lines of insurance specified in subdivisions (1) through (4), (13) through (17), (19), and (20) of section 44-201.

Laws 1971, LB 722, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 198;

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 99.